Georgia, session 2025_26, HB630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
11 SECTION 1.
12 Chapter 47 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to used motor
13 vehicle and used motor vehicle parts dealers, is amended in Code Section 43-47-2, relating
14 to definitions, by revising paragraph (3) and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (17) and adding
15 a new paragraph to read as follows:
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0630S
16 "(2.1) 'Division director' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
17 Section 43-1-1.
18 (3) 'Established place of business' means a salesroom or sales office in a building or on
19 an open lot of a retail used car dealership or at which a permanent business of bartering,
20 trading, offering, displaying, selling, buying, dismantling, or rebuilding wrecked or used
21 motor vehicles or parts is carried on, or the place at which the books, records, and files
22 necessary to conduct such business are kept. Each such place of business shall be
23 furnished with a working telephone listed in the name of the licensee for use in
24 conducting the business, and shall be marked by an appropriate permanent sign as
25 prescribed by the appropriate division under this chapter board, and meet or exceed any
26 size requirements and standards prescribed by the board."
27 "(17)(A) 'Used motor vehicle dealer' or 'used car dealer' 'Used motor vehicle dealer,'
28 'used car dealer,' or 'licensee' means any person who, for commission or with intent to
29 make a profit or gain of money or other thing of value, sells, exchanges, rents with
30 option to purchase, offers, or attempts to negotiate a sale or exchange of an interest in
31 used motor vehicles or who is engaged wholly or in part in the business of selling used
32 motor vehicles, whether or not such motor vehicles are owned by such person. A motor
33 vehicle wholesaler and a motor vehicle broker shall be deemed to be a used motor
34 vehicle dealer or a used car dealer for the purposes of this chapter. Any independent
35 motor vehicle leasing agency which sells or offers for sale used motor vehicles shall be
36 deemed to be a used motor vehicle dealer or a used car dealer for the purposes of this
37 chapter. Any motor vehicle auction company selling or offering for sale used motor
38 vehicles to independent motor vehicle dealers or to individual consumers shall be
39 deemed to be a used motor vehicle dealer or used car dealer for the purposes of this
40 chapter except as otherwise provided in division (x) of subparagraph (B) of this
41 paragraph. Without limiting any of the foregoing, the sale of five or more used motor
42 vehicles in any one calendar year shall be prima-facie evidence that a person is engaged
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0630S
43 in the business of selling used motor vehicles. A pawnbroker who disposes of all
44 repossessed motor vehicles by selling or exchanging his or her interest in such motor
45 vehicles only to licensees under this chapter shall not be considered a used motor
46 vehicle dealer under this chapter as long as such pawnbroker does not otherwise engage
47 in activities which would bring him or her under the licensing requirements of this
48 chapter."
49 SECTION 2.
50 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-3, relating to creation of
51 board, composition, terms of office, vacancies, election of chairperson, and divisions, as
52 follows:
53 "43-47-3.
54 (a) There is created a State Board of Registration of Used Motor Vehicle Dealers and Used
55 Motor Vehicle Parts Dealers. The board shall be comprised of 14 composed of ten
56 members:
57 (1) Three members shall be independent used car dealers, at least one of whom shall be
58 an independent used car dealer that sells at least 100 used motor vehicles in the State of
59 Georgia each calendar year and that primarily or exclusively sells motor vehicles online;
60 (2) One member Three members shall be appointed from the public at large and shall
61 have no connection whatsoever with the sale of used cars or parts;
62 (3) The state revenue commissioner, or a designated agent, shall be a permanent ex
63 officio member and shall be authorized to vote on all matters before the board;
64 (4) Reserved;
65 (5)(4) One member shall be a representative of the automobile auction industry;
66 (6) One member shall be an auto salvage pool operator;
67 (7)(5) Two Three members shall be used motor vehicle parts dealers who are not
68 rebuilders; and
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0630S
69 (8) One member shall be a rebuilder;
70 (9) One member shall be a pawnbroker as defined in Code Section 44-12-130 who is in
71 the business of pawning automobile titles and is licensed as a used car dealer; and
72 (10)(6) One member shall be a representative of the automobile insurance industry.
73 (b) The members of the board referred to in paragraphs (1), (2), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9),
74 and (10) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed by the Governor and shall
75 take office on July 1, 1995, or as soon thereafter as appointed. The initial terms of those 13
76 appointed members shall expire as follows: three on June 30, 1996; three on June 30, 1997;
77 three on June 30, 1998; and four on June 30, 1999. Thereafter, the appointed members of
78 the board shall serve terms of four years. All members shall be residents of this state. No
79 more than two of the appointed members shall be from the same congressional district.
80 The terms of the two ex officio members The term of the ex officio member shall be
81 coextensive with their his or her term of office.
82 (b.1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, all members
83 serving on the board as of June 30, 2025, shall continue to serve as members of the board
84 for the remainder of their terms of office but shall only be reappointed in accordance with
85 the provisions of this Code section.
86 (c) Any vacancies on the board shall be filled by the Governor for the remainder of the
87 unexpired term. The members of the board shall annually elect one of their number to
88 serve as chairperson for a term of two years. The board chairperson shall not also serve
89 contemporaneously as the chairperson of either division under this chapter. The first term
90 as chairperson of the board shall be served by a member or members elected from either
91 division under this chapter; thereafter, the chairperson for each succeeding term shall not
92 be elected from the same division as that of the chairperson from the immediately
93 preceding term. In the event a chairperson of the board is unable to complete his or her
94 term, his or her a successor for the remainder of the term shall be elected from the members
95 of the board same division as was the chairperson who is unable to complete the term. The
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0630S
96 chairperson of the board shall be an ex officio member of both divisions under this chapter,
97 however, the chairperson of the board shall not be counted for purposes of determining
98 whether a quorum is present in the division meeting for the division in which he or she is
99 not a regular member.
100 (d)(1) The board shall be composed of two divisions, a used car division and a used parts
101 division.
102 (2) The members of the used car division shall be the three independent used car dealers,
103 two of the members from the public at large, the state revenue commissioner or a
104 designated agent, the representative of the automobile auction industry, and the
105 pawnbroker. All powers and duties relating to used car dealers which are not specifically
106 reserved to the board shall be assigned to the used car division. The used car division
107 shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson of the division for a period of one
108 year.
109 (3) The members of the used parts division shall be the third member from the public at
110 large, the state revenue commissioner or a designated agent, the auto salvage pool
111 operator, the two used motor vehicle parts dealers who are not rebuilders, the rebuilder,
112 and the representative of the automobile insurance industry. All powers and duties
113 relating to used parts dealers which are not specifically reserved to the board shall be
114 assigned to the used parts division. The used parts division shall elect one of its members
115 to serve as chairperson of the division for a period of one year.
116 (4) The chairperson of the board shall determine which of the two members from the
117 public at large will serve in the used car division and which shall serve in the used parts
118 division."
119 SECTION 3.
120 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-4, relating to division
121 director as secretary of board, as follows:
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0630S
122 "43-47-4.
123 The division director shall be the secretary of the board and of the divisions. He or she shall
124 issue licenses and certificates and perform such other duties as the board or the divisions
125 may direct to carry out this chapter or as provided in Chapter 1 of this title."
126 SECTION 4.
127 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-5, relating to reimbursement
128 of board members, as follows:
129 "43-47-5.
130 The members of the board shall be reimbursed for their duties as board members and as
131 division members as provided for in subsection (f) of Code Section 43-1-2."
132 SECTION 5.
133 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-6, relating to general powers
134 and duties of the board, as follows:
135 "43-47-6.
136 All powers and duties under this chapter not specifically reserved to the board shall be the
137 powers and duties of the division. The board shall have the following powers and duties:
138 (1) To receive applications for registration of licensees and to forward them to the
139 appropriate division;
140 (2) To make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the
141 administration and enforcement of this chapter and to protect the health, safety, and
142 financial well-being of the public;
143 (3) To arrange for all new applicants to have a criminal background check, which
144 background check shall be mandatory. The applicant's fingerprints shall be forwarded
145 to the Georgia Crime Information Center which shall run a criminal background check
146 on the applicant and provide the results of the background check to the board.
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0630S
147 Additionally, the applicant's fingerprints will be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of
148 Investigation for a national criminal history record check;
149 (4) To publish in print or electronically on or before September 1 of each year an
150 alphabetical listing of all licensees pursuant to this chapter and to distribute copies of the
151 same, if requested, to the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Revenue, and
152 the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, to all sheriffs in this state, and to all county and
153 municipal police departments in this state;
154 (5) To establish a fee for a license for each principal place of business and a fee for a
155 supplemental license for each place of business not immediately adjacent to the principal
156 place of business. The board may establish separate schedules of fees for such licenses
157 depending on whether the applicant begins to do business as a licensee prior to or after
158 the issuance of any such license; and
159 (6) To do all other things necessary and proper to carry out the powers and duties listed
160 in this Code section; and
161 (7) To set the minimum size requirements and standards of an established place of
162 business."
163 SECTION 6.
164 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-7, relating to required
165 license and records, as follows:
166 "43-47-7.
167 (a) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate as a used motor vehicle dealer in this state
168 without first registering and obtaining a license from the used car division board as
169 provided in this chapter.
170 (b) It shall be unlawful for any person to operate as a used motor vehicle parts dealer in
171 this state without first registering and obtaining a license from the used parts division board
172 as provided in this chapter.
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0630S
173 (c) It shall be unlawful for any used car dealer or any used parts dealer willfully to fail to
174 keep the records required to be kept by this chapter."
175 SECTION 7.
176 Said chapter is further amended by repealing Code Section 43-47-8, relating to license
177 applications, prerequisites, license fees, renewal, training or test, supplemental license,
178 bonds, insurance, suspension for conviction or false statement, and meetings, and by enacting
179 a new Code Section 43-47-8 to read as follows:
180 "43-47-8.
181 (a) Any person desiring a license to be a used motor vehicle dealer or a used motor vehicle
182 parts dealer in this state shall submit an application on a form and in such manner as may
183 be prescribed by the board, which shall be accompanied by any applicable fees and
184 evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant:
185 (1) Maintains an established place of business;
186 (2) Has, within the preceding 12 months, attended a board approved training and
187 information seminar, which shall not exceed one day in length, or passed a board
188 approved examination, either of which shall relate to the requirements of licensees
189 provided in this chapter, including books and records to be kept, requirements of the
190 Department of Revenue applicable to licensees, and such other topics as in the opinion
191 of the board promote good business practices of licensees;
192 (3) Has applied for or obtained a certificate of registration, Department of Revenue
193 Form ST-2;
194 (4) Has posted or has made provision for the posting of the bond required under
195 subsection (d) of this Code section; and
196 (5) Maintains any liability and property damage insurance required under subsection (e)
197 of this Code section.
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0630S
198 (b) Applications for a used motor vehicle dealer license or a used motor vehicle parts
199 dealer license shall be made under oath and shall state the applicant's full name; date and
200 place of birth; date and place of any conviction or arrest for any crime, including the plea
201 of nolo contendere or a plea entered pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 8 of Title 42 or other
202 first offender treatment; and such additional information as the board may require to
203 investigate the qualifications, character, competence, and integrity of the applicant. Each
204 applicant shall submit with his or her application photographs or other renderings of his or
205 her established place of business that show the complete facility, appropriate sign, and
206 entire display area of the established place of business.
207 (c) Each applicant for a used motor vehicle dealer license or a used motor vehicle parts
208 dealer license shall furnish to the board a full set of fingerprints to enable a criminal
209 background investigation to be conducted on the applicant so as to determine the
210 applicant's suitability to be licensed under this chapter. The board shall submit the
211 applicant's fingerprints to the Georgia Crime Information Center. If no criminal record is
212 identified at the state level, the Georgia Crime Information Center is authorized to submit
213 the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history check.
214 The Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the board in writing of the results of
215 such criminal background investigation, which shall be used by the board for the exclusive
216 purpose of carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter, shall not be a public record,
217 shall be privileged, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency. The applicant
218 shall be responsible for all fees associated with the performance of such background
219 investigation.
220 (d)(1) Licensees shall be required, for each license or supplemental license issued in
221 connection with an established place of business, to post a bond that is executed with a
222 surety company duly authorized to do business in this state. Such bond shall be payable
223 to the Governor for the use and benefit of any purchaser and vendees or successors in title
224 of any used motor vehicle and shall be conditioned to pay all losses, damages, and
- 9 -

25 LC 55 0630S
225 expenses that may be sustained by such purchaser, his or her vendees, or successors in
226 title that may be occasioned by reason of any misrepresentation, deceptive practice, or
227 unfair practice or by reason of any breach of warranty as to such used vehicle. Such bond
228 shall be in the amount of $35,000.00 for used car dealers and $10,000.00 for used parts
229 dealers and shall be filed, prior to or immediately upon the granting of a license under
230 this chapter, with the division director by the licensee and shall be approved by the
231 division director as to form and as to the solvency of the surety.
232 (2) No licensee shall cancel, or cause to be canceled, a bond issued pursuant to this
233 subsection unless the board is informed in writing by a certified letter at least 30 days
234 prior to the proposed cancellation.
235 (3) If a surety or licensee cancels a bond issued pursuant to this subsection and the
236 licensee fails to submit, within ten days of the effective date of the cancellation, a new
237 bond, the board may revoke his or her license.
238 (e)(1) Except for any person licensed under Chapter 6 of this title, who shall be exempt
239 from the requirements of this subsection, licensees shall maintain, for each license or
240 supplemental license issued in connection with an established place of business, public
241 liability and property damage insurance with liability limits of not less than $50,000.00
242 per person and $100,000.00 per accident, personal insurance liability coverage, and
243 $25,000.00 property damage liability coverage.
244 (2) No licensee shall cancel or cause to be canceled an insurance policy issued pursuant
245 to this subsection unless the board is so informed in writing by certified mail at least 30
246 days prior to the proposed cancellation.
247 (3) If an insurance company or licensee cancels an insurance policy required under this
248 subsection and the licensee fails to submit, within ten days of the effective date of such
249 cancellation, a new insurance policy, the board may revoke his or her license.
250 (f)(1) Each license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be in connection with a single
251 established place of business, and licensees shall be required to obtain a supplemental
- 10 -

25 LC 55 0630S
252 license for each additional established place of business that is operated or proposed to
253 be operated by the licensee that is not contiguous to an established place of business for
254 which a license or supplemental license has been issued; provided, however, that a
255 supplemental license shall not be required for any temporary site of a licensee.
256 (2) A licensee applying for a supplemental license shall submit an application on a form
257 and in such a manner as may be prescribed by the board accompanied by any applicable
258 fees. Such application shall include:
259 (A) The licensee's license number;
260 (B) Photographs or other renderings of the licensee's additional established place of
261 business for which a supplemental license is sought that shows the complete facility,
262 appropriate sign, and entire display area of the additional established place of business;
263 (C) Evidence that the licensee has posted, or has made provision for the posting, of the
264 bond required under subsection (d) of this Code section for such additional established
265 place of business; and
266 (D) Evidence that the licensee maintains any liability and property damage insurance
267 required under subsection (e) of this Code section for such additional established place
268 of business.
269 (g) All licenses issued under this chapter shall be renewable biennially. The board may
270 establish continuing education requirements for license renewals."
271 SECTION 8.
272 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-47-8.2, relating to place of business,
273 temporary sites, and penalties, by revising paragraph (5) of subsection (b) as follows:
274 "(5) The fee for each application for a temporary site permit shall be $100.00 established
275 by the board."
- 11 -

25 LC 55 0630S
276 SECTION 9.
277 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-9, relating to contents of
278 licenses, display of licenses, and endorsement of change of business location on licenses, as
279 follows:
280 "43-47-9.
281 (a) The licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall specify the location of each place of
282 business or branch or other location occupied or to be occupied by the licensee in
283 conducting his or her business; and the license or supplemental license issued therefor shall
284 be conspicuously displayed on each of such premises. In the event any such location is
285 changed, the appropriate division shall endorse the change of location on the license
286 without charge.
287 (b) If such location, as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, of a licensee is
288 changed, the licensee shall, at least 30 days prior to relocating to a new location, submit a
289 change of location application, together with any additional fees as established by the
290 board, to the division director. Such application shall be submitted in a form and manner
291 as prescribed by the division director and shall include the licensee's license number and
292 photographs of the new location in accordance with subsection (b) of Code
293 Section 43-47-8. If the division director determines that the new location meets the
294 requirements of this chapter and of the rules and regulations of the board, the division
295 director shall approve the application and issue a new license that specifies the new
296 location."
297 SECTION 10.
298 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-10, relating to investigation
299 of licensees by board, suspension or revocation of license, and other sanctions, as follows:
- 12 -

25 LC 55 0630S
300 "43-47-10.
301 The board or each division may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the verified
302 complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any licensee or anyone who
303 shall assume to act in such capacity. The board Each division shall have power, in addition
304 to the other powers authorized by this chapter, to revoke or to suspend a license for a
305 specified time, to be determined in its discretion, or to invoke such other lesser sanctions,
306 including but not limited to the imposition of fines and penalty fees, which the board is
307 hereby authorized to create by rule, where:
308 (1) The licensee is found by a majority of the members of the board to have committed
309 any one or more of the following:
310 (A) Material misstatement in an application for a license;
311 (B) Willful and intentional failure to comply with any provisions of this chapter or any
312 lawful rule or regulation issued by the board under this chapter;
313 (C) Making any substantial misrepresentation;
314 (D) Making any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce;
315 (E) Pursuing a continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or the making of
316 false promises through agents, salespersons, advertising, or otherwise;
317 (F) Failure to account for or to remit any moneys coming into his or her possession
318 which belong to others;
319 (G) Having demonstrated unworthiness or incompetency to act as a licensee in such
320 manner as to safeguard the interest of the public;
321 (H) Fraud or fraudulent practice, unfair and deceptive acts or practices, misleading acts
322 or practices, or untrustworthiness or incompetency to act as a licensee, including, but
323 not limited to, the failure to provide the appropriate odometer disclosure forms required
324 by law or knowingly selling or offering for sale any used car on which the odometer has
325 been tampered with to reflect lower than the actual mileage the car has been driven;
- 13 -

25 LC 55 0630S
326 (I) The intentional use of any false, fraudulent, or forged statement or document or the
327 use of any fraudulent, deceitful, dishonest, or immoral practice in connection with any
328 of the licensing requirements as provided for in this chapter;
329 (J) The commission of any crime involving violence, a used motor vehicle, illegal
330 drugs, tax evasion, failure to pay taxes, or any crime involving the illegal use, carrying,
331 or possession of a dangerous weapon; the conviction of, plea of guilty to, or plea of
332 nolo contendere to a crime involving violence, a used motor vehicle, illegal drugs, tax
333 evasion, failure to pay taxes, or any crime involving the illegal use, carrying, or
334 possession of a dangerous weapon shall be conclusive evidence of the commission of
335 such crime;
336 (K) Use of untruthful or improbable statements or flamboyant or extravagant claims
337 concerning such licensee's excellence or abilities;
338 (L) The performance of any dishonorable or unethical conduct likely to deceive,
339 defraud, mislead, unfairly treat, or harm the public;
340 (M) The use of any false or fraudulent statement in any document in connection with
341 the business as a licensee;
342 (N) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting
343 the violation of, or conspiring to violate any of the provisions of this chapter, including
344 but not limited to (i) the failure to maintain the certificate of registration required by
345 Code Section 43-47-8 and (ii) the failure to keep records required by this chapter;
346 (O) Any other conduct, whether of the same or a different character than heretofore
347 specified, which constitutes dishonest dealing;
348 (P)(i) Any of the following activities by an automobile auction:
349 (I) Allowing a motor vehicle to be sold through an auction where the seller's name
350 does not appear on the face of the title;
- 14 -

25 LC 55 0630S
351 (II) Failing to refund all of the purchase price to the buyer when the title and tag
352 receipt are not assigned to and processed for the buyer within 21 days of the
353 purchase;
354 (III) Failing to make available to the board, for investigative purposes, auction
355 records of a seller, for the purpose of determining if a seller sold more than five
356 motor vehicles in a calendar year; provided, however, that the board shall give the
357 auction reasonable notice during normal working hours;
358 (IV) Failing to disclose in a conspicuous manner on the bill of sale that a buyer is
359 entitled to a refund of all of the purchase price when the title and tag receipt are not
360 assigned and processed within 21 days of the purchase;
361 (V) Failing to include on the bill of sale any warranty disclaimer; or
362 (VI) Accepting or delivering a certificate of title signed in blank.
363 (ii) The provisions of this subparagraph shall not apply where:
364 (I) The sale of the motor vehicle is not open to the general public;
365 (II) Either the seller or purchaser of the vehicle is a licensed used car dealer;
366 (III) The motor vehicle is sold as a repossessed or abandoned vehicle; or
367 (IV) The motor vehicle is sold on behalf of any government agency or by court
368 order.
369 (iii) A violation of this subparagraph shall also be grounds for suspension or censure
370 of a license under Code Section 43-6-18, and any auction violating this subparagraph
371 may be required by the board to surrender its master tag;
372 (Q) Acting to obtain or holding a license on behalf of another person who was
373 previously denied a license or had a license suspended or revoked under this chapter;
374 in making determinations under this subparagraph, the division board may look at any
375 competent evidence, including, but not limited to, who actually directs the activities at
376 the business and who actually receives the proceeds from the business;
- 15 -

25 LC 55 0630S
377 (R) Having purchased, concealed, possessed, or otherwise acquired or disposed of a
378 vehicle, knowing the same to be stolen;
379 (S) Having failed to meet and maintain the requirements for issuance of a license as
380 provided for in this chapter;
381 (T) Having failed to pay within 30 days after written demand from the board any fees
382 or penalties due on vehicles acquired for dismantling or rebuilding; or
383 (U) Having willfully failed to keep or maintain the records required to be kept by this
384 chapter; or
385 (V) Having vacated the location of its place of business for thirty days or more without
386 having submitted a change of location application pursuant to Code Section 43-47-9;
387 or
388 (2) A majority of the members of the division board find that the licensee failed to
389 establish, maintain, or monitor procedural safeguards to ensure that the following
390 activities do not occur at the business, regardless of whether the licensee had actual
391 knowledge of any such activity or activities or regardless of whether there was an intent
392 on the part of any person to engage in any such activity or activities:
393 (A) Unfair and deceptive acts or practices as defined in Part 2 of Article 15 of
394 Chapter 1 of Title 10, the 'Fair Business Practices Act of 1975';
395 (B) Any of those activities described in paragraphs (1) through (6) of Code
396 Section 40-3-90; or
397 (C) Failure to obtain a certificate of title for a purchaser."
398 SECTION 11.
399 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-47-12, relating to maintenance of records
400 by licensees and possession of vehicle or parts as evidence of purchase for resale, by revising
401 paragraph (4) of subsection (a) as follows:
- 16 -

25 LC 55 0630S
402 "(4) Any other records which the appropriate division board may reasonably require to
403 protect the public, as relating to the licensee's method of operation and personnel
404 employed."
405 SECTION 12.
406 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-14, relating to fines for
407 violation of chapter, as follows:
408 "43-47-14.
409 The Each division or the board may impose a fine not to exceed $500.00 for each violation
410 of any provision of this chapter. Such fines shall be listed in a schedule contained in the
411 rules and regulations of the board. The licensee shall pay the fine within 30 days after
412 receiving written notification from either the appropriate division board or a representative
413 of the division board unless the licensee requests in writing a hearing before the division
414 board. Such request for a hearing must be received by the division board within 30 days
415 after receipt of the written notification from the division board. Failure either to pay the
416 fine or request a hearing shall result in immediate suspension of the license pending a
417 hearing by the board to determine whether revocation or other disciplinary action should
418 be imposed on the licensee."
419 SECTION 13.
420 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-47-17, relating to consent to
421 inspection as condition of licensure, as follows:
422 "43-47-17.
423 Every person required to be licensed under this chapter shall, as a condition of licensure,
424 be deemed to have granted authority and permission to the board, to either division, or to
425 any peace officer to inspect any record or document and any motor vehicle or motor
426 vehicle part or accessory at or on the premises of his or her principal place of business, or
- 17 -

25 LC 55 0630S
427 any additional place of business, at any reasonable time during the day or night during
428 reasonable business hours."
429 SECTION 14.
430 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 43-47-21, relating to civil penalty, civil
431 action, right of private action, and persons already licensed to make changes at time of
432 renewal of license, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
433 "(b) The penalty provided in subsection (a) of this Code section and any restitution due to
434 specifically named consumers for violations of this chapter shall be recoverable by a civil
435 action brought by the division, the board, the Attorney General, or any district attorney,
436 solicitor-general, or municipal or county attorney in any superior or state court having
437 proper jurisdiction. The proceeds of any civil penalty shall be remitted to the board by the
438 clerk of the court in which such case is filed; provided, however, that in an action brought
439 on behalf of a county or municipality one-half of the proceeds of such civil penalty shall
440 be paid into the treasury of such county or municipality. The court shall order any
441 restitution recovered on behalf of any consumer to be paid over directly to the consumer
442 by the defendant."
443 SECTION 15.
444 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
445
- 18 -